Washington statutes.
RCW 43.132.030

Designation of department of commerce to prepare fiscal notes—Cooperation of state agencies, legislative staffs, and local government associations.

The director of financial management is hereby empowered to designate the director of commerce as the official responsible for the preparation of fiscal notes authorized and required by this chapter. It is the intent of the legislature that when necessary the resources of other state agencies, appropriate legislative staffs, and the various associations of local government may be employed in the development of such fiscal notes.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2058; 1995 c 399 s 80; 1985 c 6 s 10; 1979 c 151 s 150; 1977 ex.s. c 19 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.